Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5515.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 227. (1) A person shall not carry a dagger, dirk, stiletto, a double-edged nonfolding stabbing instrument of any length with a blade longer than 6 inches, or any other dangerous weapon longer than 6 inches, except a hunting or fishing knife adapted and carried as such, a hunting or fishing knife, concealed on or about his or her that person, or whether concealed or otherwise in any vehicle operated or occupied by the person, except in his or her the person's dwelling house, place of business, or on other land possessed by the person. (2) A person shall not carry a pistol concealed on or about his or her that person, or, whether concealed or otherwise, in a vehicle operated or occupied by the person, except in his or her the person's dwelling house, place of business, or on other land possessed by the person, without a license to carry the pistol as provided by law and if licensed, shall not carry the pistol in a place or manner inconsistent with any restrictions upon such on that license. (3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony , punishable by imprisonment for not more than 5 years , or by a fine of not more than $2,500.00.